web/comori-od-es/hunspell/ro_simple/ro_simple.dic
Adania/U
Adelaida/U
Adina/U
Adrian/T
Adriana/U
Afrodita/U
Agapia/U
Aglaia/U
Aida/U
Alberta/U
Alecu/T
Alesia/U
Alexa/U
Alexandru/T
Alexia/U
Alicia/U
Alina/U
Ama/U
Amanda/U
Amedeia/U
Aminta/U
Ana/U
Analia/U
Anastasia/U
Anastasiu/T
Anda/U
Andrada/U
Anemona/U
Angel/T
Angela/U
Anghel/T
Anghelina/U
Anica/U
Aniela/U
Anita/U
Antanasia/U
Antonia/U
Arabela/U
Argetoianu/T
Ariadna/U
Athena/U
Augusta/U
Aurel/T
Aurelian/T
Aurora/U
Averescu/T
Avramescu/T
Barbara/U
Barbu/T
Bartolomeu/T
Belinda/U
Berta/U
Bianca/U
Bogdan/T
Bogdana/U
Bogdanel/T
Bran/T
Briana/U
Briseida/U
Bubu/T
Banel/T
Camelia/U
Cameliu/T
Carina/U
Carmela/U
Casandra/U
Casian/T
Caterina/U
Catrina/U
Celestina/U
Cenusareasa/U
Cesonia/U
Chiara/U
Chiracu/T
Chiru/T
Ciprian/T
Cipriana/U
Ciutacu/T
Claudia/U
Claudiu/T
Cleopatra/U
Columbeanu/T
Coman/T
Constantina/U
Coposu/T
Corina/U
Cornel/T
Corneliu/T
Cosmina/U
Costel/T
Costinel/T
Crenguta/U
Cristian/T
Cristiana/U
Craita/U
Calin-Popescu/T
Catalina/U
Dacian/T
Dafina/U
Dalia/U
Dalina/U
Damian/T
Dan-Cristian/T
Dan/T
Dania/U
Daniel/T
Daria/U
Darian/T
Denia/U
Denissa/U
Despina/U
Dida/U
Dinescu/T
Dinu/T
Dochia/U
Dora/U
Dorel/T
Dorinel/T
Doru/T
Dragan/T
Draguta/U
Dudu/T
Duiliu/T
Dumitrita/U
Dumitru/T
Dumnezeu/T
Eda/U
Elena/U
Elian/T
Eliana/U
Eliza/U
Emanuel/T
Emanuela/U
Emilian/T
Emiliana/U
Erica/U
Erinda/U
Eufrosina/U
Eusebiu/T
Eva/U
Evelina/U
Fabian/T
Fenicia/U
Filipa/U
Fiona/U
Flaviu/T
Floarea/U
Florenta/U
Florian/T
Florica/U
Florinel/T
Florinela/U
Fortuna/U
Francisca/U
Gabriel/T
Galatanu/T
Gavrila/U
Gelu/T
Genoveva/U
Georgia/U
Georgina/U
Geza/U
Gianina/U
Gigel/T
Gilda/U
Gina/U
Giurescu/T
Gloria/U
Gogu/T
Gratian/T
Greta/U
Helena/U
Hermiona/U
Horatiu/T
Iancu/T
Iaridna/U
Ileana/U
Ina/U
Ioan/T
Iona/U
Ionel/T
Iorgu/T
Irina/U
Irinel/T
Isamu/T
Ispirescu/T
Istvan/T
Iulian/T
Iuliana/U
Iuliu/T
Ivan/T
Izabela/U
Jan/T
Jean/T
Jenica/U
Joel/T
Joian/T
Juana/U
Justinian/T
Karina/U
Larisa/U
Laurentiu/T
Leana/U
Lehel/T
Letitia/U
Ligia/U
Lisa/U
Liviu/T
Lizuca/U
Loriana/U
Lucescu/T
Lucian/T
Luciana/U
Lucretiu/T
Lugojan/T
Lacramioara/U
Malina/U
Manuel/T
Marcel/T
Marcia/U
Marcu/T
Marian/T
Mariana/U
Marina/U
Marinel/T
Marta/U
Maximilian/T
Medana/U
Melita/U
Micsunica/U
Mihai-Razvan/T
Miluca/U
Minculescu/T
Mirabela/U
Mirel/T
Miruna/U
Mitru/T
Misu/T
Monica/U
Margaritescu/T
Marioara/U
Nana/U
Neagu/T
Nedelcu/T
Nelu/T
Nelutu/T
Nichita/U
Nicu/T
Nicula/U
Nicusoru/T
Ninel/T
Nistorescu/T
Nucu/T
Oana/U
Octavian/T
Odiseu/T
Olimpia/U
Olimpiu/T
Oliviu/T
Olteanu/T
Oprescu/T
Orfeu/T
Otilia/U
Ovidiu/T
Panaitescu/T
Paraschiva/U
Patriciu/T
Pavel/T
Petra/U
Petru/T
Predoiu/T
Puiu/T
Radu/T
Rafael/T
Rafaela/U
Raisa/U
Regina/U
Relu/T
Rica/U
Roman/T
Romanita/U
Roza/U
Ryan/T
Razvan/T
Sabrina/U
Samuel/T
Sanda/U
Sandu/T
Sebastian/T
Septimiu/T
Sergiu/T
Sidonia/U
Silvestru/T
Silviu/T
Simu/T
Smara/U
Smarandescu/T
Sonia/U
Sorel/T
Sorescu/T
Sorinelu/T
Stan/T
Stana/U
Stelian/T
Stoian/T
Stoiciu/T
Stolojan/T
Santimbreanu/T
Sanziana/U
Sandel/T
Teodora/U
Teodoreanu/T
Tiana/U
Tiberian/T
Tiberiu/T
Tibetiu/T
Traian/T
Tudoran/T
Tudorita/U
Tanasescu/T
Ursu/T
Valeria/U
Valerian/T
Valeriu/T
Venera/U
Veronel/T
Victoria/U
Viorel/T
Viorica/U
Virgil-Adrian/T
Virgiliu/T
Vlaicu/T
Voican/T
Voichita/U
Voicu/T
Zaira/U
Zgaru/T
Zimoflesian/T
Zoica/U
acropetal/L
adsorbant/L
agrar/L
aguti/l
alchidal/l
aldan/L
aluminat/l
aluminosilicat/l
alami/l
ambigen/L
aminobenzen/l
amoniac/l
analgezic/L
anofelogen/L
antihemoroidal/L
antimetabolit/l
antineutrino/l
antologic/L
april/l
arab/L
arginti/l
arhimilionar/L
arhon/l
aril/l
arval/l
arariel/l
ascorbic/l
asincron/L
asmatuchi/l
asmatui/l
aur/l
aurar/L
azotil/L
babau/l
bandurar/L
baribal/l
bebi/l
becar/L
belzebut/l
bengali/l
bibiloi/L
biofizic/L
bivolas/L
boltas/L
branchipus/l
branhiozaur/L
bromic/l
brumar/l
brumarel/l
bucal/L
bucsau/l
bulbucel/l
bumbac/l
bumbacel/l
burete/L
butiric/l
balegar/L
batranis/l
caftangiu/L
calao/l
calapar/l
calciferol/l
calembec/l
caloian/l
camforar/L
cappuccino/l
carabat/L
carbamic/l
cascador/L
caudillo/l
ceasornicar/L
cert/L
chimen/l
chimion/l
chitcan/L
chulo/l
cicero/l
ciclohexan/l
ciclopentan/l
cimbrisor/l
cincantin/l
ciohodar/L
ciucure/L
clopotel/L
coechipier/L
colastru/l
colesterol/l
coltar/L
comunicant/L
conlucrator/L
controlateral/L
copai/l
corai/l
coregizor/L
cosmograf/L
crijac/L
crohmal/l
crom/l
cromal/l
culm/L
cumen/l
cunial/l
cupal/l
cupru/l
carliont/L
carindar/l
caramidar/L
dandi/l
decibel/L
demitizant/L
designer/L
deuteriu/l
diclormetan/l
dimer/L
dimetilbenzen/l
distinct/L
domol/L
drummer/l
dud/L
ecleror/L
ecosez/l
electrofon/L
emolient/L
emu/l
epigon/L
ergocalciferol/l
estimatori/L
etan/l
eucaliptol/l
european/L
extracultural/L
factotum/l
fanaragiu/L
faurmaur/l
faustbal/l
fecral/l
fenic/l
fenobarital/l
fer/l
fermentator/L
fiorint/L
florer/l
fluent/L
fluorhidric/l
folk/l
fosfatator/L
fosfor/l
fox/l
fraudator/L
frez/l
fucus/l
fumaric/l
fundamental/L
furfural/l
furmint/l
galben/L
gambir/l
gecko/l
genuin/L
germanar/l
ghidusar/L
ghimbir/l
gigolo/l
glicerofosforic/l
glucocorticoid/L
golomat/l
grangur/L
grej/l
graulet/l
guaiac/L
gustar/l
haidamac/L
hamei/l
helicoidal/L
hemerocal/l
hesperornis/l
heteromorf/L
hidalgo/l
hiemal/L
hirudinicultor/L
huhurez/L
hamei/l
ibovnic/L
ilegal/L
impudic/L
inconel/l
incremental/L
infectionist/L
integrant/L
interstitial/L
irbis/L
istov/l
izotop/L
juganas/L
kaki/l
kilt/l
lacrimal/L
lactar/l
lampant/l
latir/l
lepidodendron/L
linear/L
loial/L
lupin/l
lastunas/L
maimutoi/L
malonic/l
marchitan/L
matroz/L
melofob/L
metacrilic/l
metanephros/l
meteorologist/L
metilbenzen/l
metol/l
microfotografic/L
mikado/l
miner/L
mizantropic/L
mlecin/l
momental/L
monobrombenzen/l
monsenior/L
monser/l
mosnean/L
murar/L
musetel/l
mat/L
macrisor/l
mararas/l
naht/l
naisan/L
nard/l
neconcludent/L
neloial/L
netot/L
neutrino/l
nitrobenzen/l
nitelus/L
nopal/l
nutritionist/L
naut/l
obscen/L
odos/l
oficiant/L
omolog/L
orbicular/L
orc/l
ortofosforic/l
osmol/L
paiajen/L
panacagiu/L
panda/l
paramilitar/L
pastoral/L
peduncul/L
penicilic/l
percloric/l
perimaritim/L
petrolifer/L
picaro/l
picric/l
pintenas/L
piretru/l
pixel/L
pisalau/l
plastru/l
plimbaret/L
pneumotrop/L
poliester/L
polivinilic/l
pomologic/L
popaz/l
porumbar/L
prairial/l
praj/L
premilitar/L
princip/L
propilic/l
prosimian/L
prusic/l
pravalias/L
puerperal/L
putinel/L
pastru/l
patrar/L
quetzal/l
rahianestezic/L
reflexogen/L
reticent/L
revent/l
robotician/L
rutinar/L
salicilat/L
salvamont/l
schinduf/l
scobai/L
seismolog/L
sesam/l
sextant/L
simmenthal/l
sinodic/L
sodiu/l
solenoid/L
spinulet/l
spiter/L
stiren/L
stavar/L
superior/L
susan/l
tabular/L
tanat/l
teatral/L
tenorino/l
tensorial/L
teras/l
tetrafonic/L
tetrahidrobenzen/l
tocmagel/L
tory/l
trandafir/L
tricomonas/l
triftong/L
tufan/L
tungsten/l
talhar/L
uman/L
uretral/L
vampiric/L
verif/l
vinecior/L
vinicer/l
vitrigon/l
varlav/L
zabet/l
zebu/l
zoantrop/L
intunec/l
Serban/T
Stefan/T
Stefana/U
sarpe/L
siboi/l
tal/L
tipirig/l
